Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.060

Licenses—Requirements—Renewal.

Any entity desiring to operate a private vocational school shall apply for a license to the agency on a form provided by the agency. The agency shall issue a license if the school:

(1) Files a completed application with information satisfactory to the agency. Misrepresentation by an applicant shall be grounds for the agency, at its discretion, to deny or revoke a license.

(2) Complies with the requirements for the tuition recovery trust fund under RCW 28C.10.084.

(3) Pays the required fees.

(4) Meets the minimum standards adopted by the agency under RCW 28C.10.050.

Licenses shall be valid for one year from the date of issue unless revoked or suspended. If a school fails to file a completed renewal application at least thirty days before the expiration date of its current license the school shall be subject to payment of a late filing fee fixed by the agency.

[ 2014 c 11 s 3; 1987 c 459 s 4; 1986 c 299 s 6.]